Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 483A.8, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. A nonresident who purchases an antlered or any sex deer hunting license pursuant to rules adopted pursuant to section 483A.1 , is required to purchase an antlerless deer only deer hunting license at the same time unless the zone in which the nonresident is purchasing the antlered or any sex deer hunting Senate File 2318, p. 2 license is designated by the commission as not required , pursuant to rules adopted pursuant to section 483A.1 . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2318, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor